New York, session 2025-2026, S19.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 76 to read as follows: 3 76. In the county of Warren, the provisions of this section requiring 4 a person to be a resident of the political subdivision or municipal 5 corporation of the state for which such person shall be chosen or within 6 which such person's official functions are required to be exercised, 7 shall not prevent a person from holding the office of assistant district 8 attorney, assistant public defender or assistant county attorney of the 9 county of Warren, provided that such person resides in a county adjoin- 10 ing Warren county within the state of New York; provided, however that 11 any person performing such functions or holding such offices in any 12 other county shall be a resident of such county unless otherwise 13 provided by law. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to 14 any person holding the office of first assistant public defender, the 15 holder of which would assume the duties of the public defender upon the 16 public defender's absence from the county or upon the public defender's 17 inability to perform such office's duties. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00169-01-5